lt-LT: Elektronika > Vaizdo įranga > Vaizdo grotuvai ir įrašymo įrenginiai > DVD ir „Blu-ray“ grotuvai: Nešiojami DVD grotuvai
vi: Thiết bị điện tử > Video > Đầu ghi và phát video > Đầu Blu-ray và DVD: Máy phát DVD di động
fi: Elektroniikka > Video > Videonauhurit > DVD- ja Blu-ray-soittimet: Kannettava DVD-soitin
pt-PT: Eletrónica > Vídeo > Leitores e gravadores de vídeo > Leitores de DVD e Blu-ray: Leitores de DVD portáteis
es: Electrónica > Video > Grabadores y reproductores de vídeo > Reproductores DVD y Blu-ray: Reproductores de DVD portátiles
ru: Электроника > Видеоаппаратура > Устройства для воспроизведения и записи видео > Проигрыватели дисков DVD и Blu-ray: Портативные DVD-плееры
nl: Elektronica > Video > Videospelers en -recorders > Dvd-spelers en blu ray-spelers: Draagbare dvd-spelers
pl: Elektronika > Video > Odtwarzacze i nagrywarki wideo > Odtwarzacze DVD i Blu-ray: Przenośne odtwarzacze DVD
zh-TW: 電子器材 > 視訊/影音 > 錄放影機 > DVD 和藍光播放器: 攜帶式 DVD 播放器
de: Elektronik > Video > Videoabspielgeräte & -rekorder > DVD- & Blu-ray-Player: Tragbare DVD-Player
sv: Elektronik > Video > Videospelare och videoinspelningsutrustning > DVD- och Blu-ray-spelare: Bärbara DVD-spelare
en: Electronics > Video > Video Players & Recorders > DVD & Blu-ray Players: Portable DVD Players
zh-CN: 电子产品 > 视频 > 视频播放与录制设备 > DVD 和蓝光播放器: 便携式 DVD 播放器
el: Ηλεκτρονικά > Βίντεο > Συσκευές αναπαραγωγής και εγγραφής βίντεο > Συσκευές αναπαραγωγής DVD & Blu-ray: Φορητές συσκευές αναπαραγωγής DVD
pt-BR: Eletrônicos > Vídeo > Gravadores e players de vídeo > Reprodutores de DVD e Blu-Ray: Tocadores de DVD portáteis
th: อิเล็กทรอนิกส์ > วิดีโอ > เครื่องเล่นและบันทึกวิดีโอ > เครื่องเล่น DVD และบลูเรย์: เครื่องเล่น DVD พกพา
fr: Appareil électronique > Vidéo > Lecteurs et enregistreurs vidéo > Lecteurs DVD et Blu-ray: Lecteurs DVD portables
tr: Elektronik > Video > Video Oynatıcılar ve Kaydediciler > DVD ve Blu-ray Oynatıcılar: Taşınabilir DVD Oynatıcıları
hr-HR: Elektronika > Video > Video playeri i rekorderi > DVD i Blu-ray playeri: Prijenosni uređaji za reprodukciju DVD-ova
it: Elettronica > Video > Videoriproduttori/registratori > Lettori DVD e Blu-ray: Lettori DVD portatili
ja: 電子機器 > ビデオ > 録画・再生機器 > DVD・ブルーレイプレーヤー: ポータブルDVDプレーヤー
bg-BG: Електроника > Видео > Устройства за възпроизвеждане и запис на видео > DVD и Blu-ray устройства: Преносими DVD плейъри
ro-RO: Electronice > Video > Aparate de redare și de înregistrare video > Playere DVD și Blu-ray: DVD playere portabile
da: Elektronik > Video > Videoafspillere og -optagere > Dvd- og Blu-Ray-afspillere: Bærbare DVD-afspillere
cs: Elektronika > Video > Videopřehrávače a rekordéry > Přehrávače DVD: Přenosné DVD přehrávače
sl-SI: Elektronika > Video > Video predvajalniki in snemalniki > Predvajalniki DVD-jev in Blu-ray predvajalniki: Prenosni DVD predvajalniki
sk-SK: Elektronika > Video zariadenia > Video prehrávače a rekordéry > DVD a Blu-ray prehrávače: Prenosné DVD prehrávače
ko: 전자기기 > 비디오 > 비디오 플레이어/녹화기 > DVD/블루레이 플레이어: 휴대용 DVD 플레이어
hu: Elektronika > Videó > Videólejátszók és -felvevők > DVD- és Blu-ray-lejátszók: Hordozható DVD-lejátszók
nb: Elektronikk > Video > Videospillere og -opptakere > DVD- og Blu-ray-spillere: Bærbare DVD-spillere